Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB409.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A mandatory waiting period of five (5) business days shall be required between
the sale of a firearm and the transfer of the firearm to the buyer.
(2) Records of firearm sales shall be made available at all reasonable hours for
inspection by any peace officer acting within the scope of his or her duties.
(3) This section does not apply to a firearm transfer that does not require a
background check under 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(t).
Section 2. KRS 237.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 237.030 to 237.050 shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 237.030 to 237.050, and in
so doing uses any destructive device or booby trap device to avoid detection by law
enforcement or other government personnel or to avoid theft or detection by any
other person, of any controlled substance as set forth in KRS Chapter 218A and
held in violation of KRS 218A.140, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
(3) Any person who violates Section 1 of this Act shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:39 AM Jacketed